Utah statutes.
3-1-3.   Qualifications of incorporators.

(1)  Five or more individuals may form an association if they are:

(a)  at least 18 years of age; and

(b)  engaged in agriculture.

(2) One or more associations of individuals engaged in agriculture referred to in Subsection (1) may form an association.

